Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 468.073 is amended to read:
468.073. (1)(a) [ The Department of Environmental Quality may enter into an agreement with ] Any
applicant, permittee or regulated entity  may  enter into an agreement with the Department of
Environmental Quality setting a schedule  of payments to the department for the purpose of ena-
bling the department to expedite or enhance a regulatory process by contracting for  services, hiring
additional staff or covering costs of activities not otherwise provided during the ordinary course of
department business. The department may expend moneys received under the agreements for:
[(a)] (A)  Activities undertaken by the  department under authority of any provision of ORS
chapters 448, 453, 454, 459, 459A, 465, 466, 467, 468, 468A and 468B and ORS 475.405 to 475.495.
[(b)] (B)  Administering and  reviewing activities [ described under subsection (3) of this section that
are] performed by a third party  pursuant to this section .
(C) Hiring additional staff, including  limited duration employees, for the purpose of ex-
pediting or enhancing the regulatory process.
(b) Before hiring additional staff or contracting with  a third party to provide services
pursuant to this section, the department shall  evaluate opportunities to perform the services
with existing staff.
(2)(a) An applicant, permittee or regulated entity may request that the department enter
into an agreement described in subsection (1) of this section. The request must include:
(A) A complete description of each permit, authorization  or other regulatory determi-
nation for which the agreement is being requested;
(B) A statement of need that includes an explanation of why the  expedited or enhanced
regulatory process is in the public interest; and
(C) A demonstration that the requester has  secured any land use permit, authorization
or other approval necessary for the project for which an agreement under subsection (1) of
this section is being sought.
(b) The department shall evaluate whether the expedited  or enhanced regulatory process
is in the public interest by considering:
(A) Project readiness; and
Enrolled House Bill 4102 (HB 4102-INTRO) Page 1
(B) The number of department regulatory activities that are outstanding  and the impact
on those activities from an agreement for the expedited or enhanced regulatory process.
(3)(a) No later than 45 business days after receiving a written request to enter into  an
agreement under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall notify  the requester in
writing that:
(A) The request is granted; or
(B) The request is denied based on the department’s consideration of the factors  de-
scribed in subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(b) Notices provided to requesters under this subsection must include a description of the
department’s consideration of the factors described in subsection (2)(b) of this section.  A
requester may submit a request for reconsideration of  a notice provided under paragraph
(a)(B) of this subsection to the Director of the Department of  Environmental Quality. The
director’s decision on a request for reconsideration is not subject to judicial review  under
ORS chapter 183.
(4)(a) The department shall make available on the department’s website:
(A) Agreements entered into under subsection (1) of this section;
(B) Notices provided to applicants under subsection (3) of this section; and
(C) A list of third parties hired or contracted with by the department and a  description
of the services rendered.
(b) Information made  available by the department under this subsection must be
redacted to exclude any  trade secrets, as defined in ORS 646.461, or other confidential busi-
ness information.
(5) The department may not waive any of the department’s authority or obligations under
any provision of  ORS chapters 448, 453, 454, 459, 459A, 465, 466, 467, 468, 468A and 468B and
ORS 475.405 to 475.495 or rules adopted by the Environmental  Quality Commission by enter-
ing into an  agreement under subsection (1) of this section. Except as provided in subsection
(6) of this section, the department may not waive or alter any obligation or requirement of
an applicant, permittee or regulated entity under  any provision of ORS chapters 448, 453, 454,
459, 459A, 465, 466, 467, 468, 468A and  468B and ORS 475.405 to 475.495 or any rule adopted
by the commission by entering into an agreement under subsection (1) of this section.
[(2)] (6) Payments agreed  to under subsection (1) of this section shall be for services voluntarily
requested by the applicant, permittee or regulated entity. As part of  the agreement, the department
may waive all or part  of any fee otherwise imposed for those services. The department shall not
alter or establish processing priorities  or schedules based upon an expectation of entering into an
agreement under subsection (1) of this section.
[(3) Not later than  July 1, 1998, the department shall identify department activities or portions
thereof suitable for  contracting out to third parties. Failure of the department to identify a specific ac-
tivity shall not prevent the expenditure of funds for that activity or for department administration  and
review of that activity under an agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. ]
[(4)] (7) Any moneys received by the department  under an agreement described under subsection
(1) of this section shall not exceed the cost to the department of providing the service to the appli-
cant, permittee or regulated entity.
[(5)] (8)  Any payments received under an  agreement described under [ subsections (1) to (4) ]
subsection (1) of this  section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of an account
of the Department of Environmental Quality and are continuously appropriated for the  purposes
specified in the individual agreements.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (2)  of this section, the department shall, in a timely
manner, enter into an agreement  under subsection (1) of this section with an applicant,
permittee or regulated entity if:
(a) The applicant has submitted a complete application  for a permit, authorization or
other regulatory determination with  all information necessary for the department to take
action;
Enrolled House Bill 4102 (HB 4102-INTRO) Page 2
(b) Qualified and appropriate third-party contractors are available;
(c) At least one year has passed since the department denied a request by the  applicant,
permittee or regulated entity to enter  into an agreement under subsection (1) of this section;
and
(d) The regulatory process  for which the applicant, permittee or regulated entity sought
to enter into an agreement has not been substantially completed.
(10) Upon completion of the work conducted by a third party, the department shall  ex-
pedite commencement of any relevant public process requirements and take  action on the
application for the permit, authorization or other regulatory determination.
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments to ORS 468.073 by section 1 of  this 2026 Act become
operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality may take any action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the department to
exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by the amendments to ORS 468.073
by section 1 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2026 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 10, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4102 (HB 4102-INTRO) Page 3